Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.185.040

Contracts with University of Washington for education of highly capable students at early entrance program or transition school—Allocation of funds—Rules.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall contract with the University of Washington for the education of highly capable students below eighteen years of age who are admitted or enrolled at such early entrance program or transition school as are now or hereafter established and maintained by the University of Washington.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall allocate directly to the University of Washington all of the state basic education allocation moneys, state categorical moneys excepting categorical moneys provided for the highly capable students program under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030, and federal moneys generated by a student while attending an early entrance program or transition school at the University of Washington. The allocations shall be according to each student's school district of residence. The expenditure of such moneys shall be limited to selection of students, precollege instruction, special advising, and related activities necessary for the support of students while attending a transition school or early entrance program at the University of Washington. Such allocations may be supplemented with such additional payments by other parties as necessary to cover the actual and full costs of such instruction and other activities.

(3) The provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall apply during the first three years a student is attending a transition school or early entrance program at the University of Washington or through the academic school year in which the student turns eighteen, whichever occurs first. No more than thirty students shall be admitted and enrolled in the transition school at the University of Washington in any one year.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt or amend rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW implementing subsection (2) of this section before August 31, 1989.

[ 1990 c 33 s 169; 1989 c 233 s 9; 1987 c 518 s 222. Formerly RCW 28A.58.217.]

NOTES:

Intent—1994 c 166; 1987 c 518: See note following RCW 43.216.525.

Severability—1987 c 518: See note following RCW 43.216.525.